Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska39-8,114
Interstate bridges; closing; barricades; assumption of risk.

The barricades, fences, or other enclosures erected upon any interstate bridge shall serve as notice to the public that the area closed is unsafe for travel and that any person entering such area, without the permission or consent of the party authorized to close such area, shall do so at his own risk.

Laws 1959, c. 175, § 24, p. 642.